Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

49 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 1 to 86.

§ 1-16-101.
Rights of minors reserved.

It is not necessary to
reserve in a judgment or order the right of a minor to show cause
why such order or judgment should be set aside after he attains the
age of majority, but in any case in which such reservation would have
been proper, the minor may show cause against such order or judgment
within one (1) year after arriving at the age of majority.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 337; R.S. 1887, § 2677; R.S. 1899, § 3771; C.S. 1910, § 4626; C.S. 1920, § 5899; R.S. 1931, § 89-2607; C.S. 1945, § 3-3607; W.S. 1957, § 1-306; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-101

.

Cross references. —

For provision concerning minors as parties to actions, see §

1-1-102

.

As to saving clause for actions other than recovery of real property, see §

1-3-114

.

For age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

§ 1-16-102.
Interest on judgments.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, all decrees and judgments for the payment of money shall bear interest at ten percent (10%) per year from the date of rendition until paid.

If the decree or judgment is founded on a contract and all parties to the contract agreed to interest at a certain rate, the rate of interest on the decree or judgment shall correspond to the terms of the contract.

A periodic payment or installment for child support or maintenance which is unpaid on the date due and which on or after July 1, 1990, becomes a judgment by operation of law pursuant to W.S.

14-2-204

shall not bear interest.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 207, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-308.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-102

; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2; 1990, ch. 89, § 2; 2003, ch. 93, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to interest rate when not provided by agreement or provision of law, see § 40-14-106(e).

Allowance of interest is not in discretion of court. —

Trial court
did not erroneously fail to award postjudgment interest because such
interest was available whether stated in a judgment or not. Halling v. Yovanovich, 2017 WY 28, 391 P.3d 611,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2017).

Record insufficient to determine if interest is appropriate.—

Remand on the issue of post-judgment interest was necessary because the record was not adequate to determine whether, when, or how pre- or post-judgment interest should apply. Lew v. Lew, 2019 WY 99, 449 P.3d 683,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2019).

Contracts entered into prior to 1988 amendment. —

This section, as amended in 1988, applies to judgments entered after the 1988 effective date (June 9, 1988), but arising out of obligations incurred before the effective date. The interest is on the judgment, not on the note. Gose v. Hess, 822 P.2d 846,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1991).

Prejudgment interest on arbitration awards against governmental entities is not available.

Hot Springs County Sch. Dist. v. Strube Constr. Co., 715 P.2d 540,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1986).

Prejudgment interest is recoverable on liquidated, but not unliquidated, claims;

a liquidated claim is one readily computable by simple mathematical computation. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. Elmore Livestock Co., 669 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1983).

There is no common-law right to interest on a judgment,

and it is strictly statutory. Pure Gas & Chem. Co. v. Cook, 526 P.2d 986,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1974).

Allowance of interest is not in discretion of court

entering judgment, but it is a grant from the legislature of the state, and no court may refuse to give it effect. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

Interest not awarded on contested worker's compensation claim. —

Supreme court rejected the general interest statute as a basis for awarding interest on a contested worker’s compensation claim because the Worker’s Compensation Act did not expressly authorize an award of interest on contested claims; the general interest statute applied to judgments and decrees, not to administrative awards; and workers’ compensation awards were administrative determinations, not judgments. Air Methods v. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2018 WY 128, 432 P.3d 476,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2018).

Rate of interest on unpaid judgments in child support case.
—

In determining the father's income for child support purposes, simply applying the statutory rate of interest for unpaid judgments to the father's investment portfolio to estimate the father's entire income was not necessarily an accurate means to determine the father's actual income; the interest rate used should be based on some reasonable relationship to the father's actual investment income. Thus, a remand was appropriate so that the trial court could determine whether the 10 percent rate was a reasonable interest rate to estimate the father's investment income. Groenstein v. Groenstein, 2005 WY 6, 104 P.3d 765,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2005).

Because child support arrears did not become a judgment by operation of law under the relevant statute, as the matter was not an action separate from the parties' divorce proceedings, but was initiated by a mother's motion to show cause that was filed in the original divorce action, the mother was not entitled to a 10 percent penalty. However, the delinquent amounts did bear interest by the relevant statute at a rate of 10 percent per year from the date of rendition. Rambo v. Rambo, 2017 WY 32, 391 P.3d 1108,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2017).

Prospective purchasers, upon failure to obtain loan, entitled
to interest on earnest money. —

Prospective purchasers of home were entitled to prejudgment interest on the earnest money paid to the prospective sellers at the rate of seven percent per annum from the date of demand, upon the failure of the prospective purchasers to obtain a loan from the veterans' administration, as called for in the sales agreement, and at the judgment rate of 10% per annum thereafter. Holst v. Guynn, 696 P.2d 632,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1985) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Divorce case. —

When a Wyoming court enters a divorce decree requiring a party to pay a fixed sum of money and does not set a date for payment different than the date the decree is rendered, the judgment interest statute applies and payment of interest is required; however, when a district court enters a decree and, in the exercise of its discretion to fashion a just and equitable property division, sets a date for payment different than the date the decree is rendered or provides for payment over time, it is not required to impose interest. Therefore, in a divorce case, a district court properly exercised its discretion when it suspended payment of interest as long as a husband made annual payments of at least $15,000 toward the property allocation. Sinclair v. Sinclair, 2015 WY 120, 357 P.3d 1100,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2015).

District court ordered the father to pay the mother on a date different than the judgment, and as a result, the statute did not apply, and there was no abuse of discretion when the district court did not require the father to pay interest on the equalizing sum awarded to the mother. Williams v. Williams, 2016 WY 21, 368 P.3d 539,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2016).

Date from which interest computed. —

It is error to grant interest from the date of verdict rather than the date judgment was entered. Pure Gas & Chem. Co. v. Cook, 526 P.2d 986,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1974).

The district court erred in awarding interest on costs from the date of the original award of costs where (1) the award of costs was overturned on appeal, (2) one defendant was awarded significantly lower costs on remand, and (3) two other defendants were awarded the same costs on remand, but on different grounds. Snyder v. Lovercheck, 2001 WY 64, 27 P.3d 695,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2001).

Offer did not stop accrual of statutory interest. —

District court had discretion to determine manner in which to enforce the judgment, including the discretion to order husband to pay the unsatisfied judgment in cash; husband's offer to convey property by warranty deed did not stop accrual of statutory interest under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-16-102(a).
Burnett v. Steeley, 2008 WY 94, 190 P.3d 132,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2008).

Tender of judgment to court tolls interest. —

By tendering payment into the district court of the judgment amount as authorized by Rule 67, W.R.C.P., the party against whom judgment was rendered surrendered control of the funds to the court, and the accrual of statutory interest ceased. Parker v. Artery, 889 P.2d 520,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1995).

Defendant's good-faith deposit of the full amount of the judgment against her with the clerk of court, during the pendency of the appeal of the case, was an unconditional offer to perform coupled with the ability to carry out the offer, and was sufficient to stop the accrual of interest. Crawford v. Amadio, 932 P.2d 1288,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1997).

Supersedeas bond did not toll accrual of postjudgment interest.
—

Trial court properly held that a supersedeas bond filed by a partner did not toll the accrual of interest on a judgment in favor of an accounting firm and that the firm's recovery was not limited to the bond amount because Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-16-102(a) provided that interest accrued from the date of rendition until paid; Wyo. R. App. P. 4.02(a) indicated that the bond should be conditioned to account for interest and damages for delay.
Dorr v. Smith, 2010 WY 120, 238 P.3d 549,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Mader v. James, 546 P.2d 190,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1976).

Quoted

in

Odegard v. Odegard, 2003 WY 67, 69 P.3d 917,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2003); Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2014 WY 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Dec. 17, 2014).

Cited

in

Perry v. Vaught, 624 P.2d 776,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1981); Millheiser v. Wallace, 2001 WY 40, 21 P.3d 752,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2001); Platt v. Platt, 2014 WY 142,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Nov. 6, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Date of verdict or date of entry of judgment as beginning interest period on judgment, 1 ALR2d 479.

Date from which interest on judgment starts running, as affected by modification of amount of judgment on appeal, 4 ALR3d 1221.

Insured's right to recover from insurer prejudgment interest on amount of fire loss, 5 ALR4th 126.

Validity and construction of state statute or rule allowing or changing rate of prejudgment interest in tort actions, 40 ALR4th 147.

Retrospective application and effect of state statute or rule allowing interest or changing rate of interest on judgments or verdicts, 41 ALR4th 694.

Right to prejudgment interest on punitive or multiple damages awards, 9 ALR5th 63.

Divorce and separation: Award of interest on deferred installment payments of marital asset distribution, 10 ALR5th 191.

Allowance of interest on award of attorney's fee under § 706(k)
of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-5(k)),
77 ALR Fed 272.

§ 1-16-103.
Penalty assessed on unpaid judgment by operation of law.

As used in this section “judgment by operation of law” means a periodic payment or installment for child support or maintenance which is unpaid on the date due and which has become a judgment by operation of law pursuant to W.S.

14-2-204

.

Any judgment by operation of law which is not paid within thirty-two (32) calendar days from the date the judgment by operation of law arises is subject to an automatic late payment penalty in an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount of the judgment by operation of law.

In order to recover penalties assessed under subsection (b) of this section, the obligee shall file with the clerk of court a sworn affidavit setting forth the payment history resulting in assessment of any penalty and a computation of all penalties claimed to be due and owing. It shall not be the responsibility of the clerk to compute the amount of the penalties due and owing. If the obligor disputes the payment history or penalty computation as stated in the obligee’s sworn affidavit, the obligor shall file with the clerk of court a written request for a hearing within ten (10) days after seizure of his property under execution.

This section shall apply only to judgments by operation of law arising on or after July 1, 1990.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 89, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2.

Interest, but not a penalty incurred on child support arrearages.—

Because child support arrears did not become a judgment by operation of law under the relevant statute, as the matter was not an action separate from the parties' divorce proceedings, but was initiated by a mother's motion to show cause that was filed in the original divorce action, the mother was not entitled to a 10 percent penalty. However, the delinquent amounts did bear interest by the relevant statute at a rate of 10 percent per year from the date of rendition. Rambo v. Rambo, 2017 WY 32, 391 P.3d 1108,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2017).